Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3407
Petition; unlawful signature; penalty.

Any person who signs a petition under section 77-3402, knowing that he or she is not a qualified voter in the place where such a petition is made, or bribes or gives or pays any money or thing of value to any person directly or indirectly to induce him or her to sign the petition, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1978, Spec. Sess., LB 2, § 7.